zh-TW: 駕駛艙類型: 類比; 玻璃; 混合; 整合的; 特化的; 其他
pl: Typ kokpitu: Analogowy; Szklany; Hybrydowy; Zintegrowany; Specjalistyczny; Inne
sk-SK: Typ kokpitu: Analógový; Sklo; Hybridný; Integrovaný; Špecializované; Iné
de: Cockpittyp: Analog; Glas; Hybrid; Integriert; Spezialisiert; Sonstiges
nl: Type cockpit: Analoog; Glas; Hybride; Geïntegreerd; Gespecialiseerd; Andere
el: Τύπος πιλοτηρίου: Αναλογικό; Γυαλί; Υβριδικό; Ενσωματωμένο; Ειδικευμένο; Άλλο
hr-HR: Vrsta pilotske kabine: Analogni; Staklo; Hibridni; Integrirani; Specijalizirani; Ostalo
nb: Type førerkabin: Analog; Glass; Hybrid; Integrert; Spesialisert; Annet
lt-LT: Kabinos tipas: Analoginis; Stiklas; Hibridinė; Integruota; Specializuota; Kita
ro-RO: Tip de carlingă: Analogic; Sticlă; Hibrid; Integrat; Specializat; Altele
pt-BR: Tipo de cabine: Analógico; Vidro; Híbrido; Integrado; Especializado; Outro
zh-CN: 驾驶舱类型: 模拟; 玻璃; 混合; 集成; 专业; 其他
tr: Kokpit tipi: Analog; Cam; Hibrit; Entegre; Özel; Diğer
en: Cockpit type: Analog; Glass; Hybrid; Integrated; Specialized; Other
cs: Typ kokpitu: Analogový; Sklo; Hybridní; Integrovaný; Specializovaný; Jiné
pt-PT: Tipo de cockpit: Analógico; Vidro; Híbrido; Integrado; Especializado; Outro
hu: Pilótafülke típusa: Analóg; Üveg; Hibrid; Integrált; Speciális; Egyéb
ru: Тип кабины: Аналоговые; Стеклянные; Гибридные; Интегрированные; Специализированные; Другие
da: Cockpittype: Analog; Glas; Hybrid; Integreret; Specialiseret; Andet
sv: Typ av cockpit: Analog; Glas; Hybrid; Integrerad; Specialanpassad; Övrigt
fi: Ohjaamon tyyppi: Analoginen; Lasinen; Hybridi; Integroitu; Erikoistunut; Muu
sl-SI: Vrsta pilotske kabine: Analogni; Steklen; Hibridni; Integriran; Specializiran; Drugo
it: Tipo di cabina di guida: Analogico; Vetro; Ibrido; Integrato; Specializzato; Altro
th: ประเภทห้องนักบิน: อนาล็อก; แก้ว; ไฮบริด; ในตัว; เชี่ยวชาญ; อื่นๆ
ko: 조종석 유형: 아날로그; 유리; 하이브리드; 통합; 전문화된; 기타
ja: コックピットのタイプ: アナログ; ガラス; ハイブリッド; 一体型; 専門; その他
fr: Type de cockpit: Analogique; Verre; Hybride; Intégré; Spécialisé; Autre
es: Tipo de cabina: Analógico; Cristal; Híbrido; Integrado; Especializado; Otros
bg-BG: Тип пилотска кабина: Аналогов; Стъкло; Хибрид; Интегриран; Специализиран; Други
vi: Kiểu buồng lái: Analog; Kính; Kết hợp; Tích hợp; Chuyên dụng; Khác